Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 1
LOCAL GOVERNMENT LAND USE CONTROL ENABLING ACT

Law reviews:

For comment, "Regulating Hydraulic Fracturing Through Land Use: State Preemption Prevails", see 85 U. Colo. L. Rev. 817 (2014).

29-20-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Local Government Land Use Control Enabling Act of 1974".

Source:

L. 74:

Entire article added, p. 353, § 1, effective May 17.

29-20-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that in order to provide for planned and orderly development within Colorado and a balancing of basic human needs of a changing population with legitimate environmental concerns, the policy of this state is to clarify and provide broad authority to local governments to plan for and regulate the use of land within their respective jurisdictions. Nothing in this article shall serve to diminish the planning functions of the state or the duties of the division of planning.

The general assembly further finds and declares that local governments will be better able to properly plan for growth and serve new residents if they are authorized to impose impact fees as a condition of approval of development permits. However, impact fees and other development charges can affect growth and development patterns outside a local government's jurisdiction, and uniform impact fee authority among local governments will encourage proper growth management.

Source:

L. 74:

Entire article added, p. 353, § 1, effective May 17.

L. 2001, 2nd Ex. Sess.:

Entire section amended, p. 27, § 1, effective November 6.

29-20-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Development permit" means any preliminary or final approval of an application for rezoning, planned unit development, conditional or special use permit, subdivision, development or site plan, or similar application for new construction; except that, solely for purposes of part 3 of this article:

Each application included in the definition of development permit constitutes a stage in the development permit approval process; and

"Development permit" is limited to an application regarding a specific project that includes new water use in an amount more than that used by fifty single-family equivalents, or fewer as determined by the local government.

(1.3) "Fire and emergency services provider" means a fire protection district organized under article 1 of title 32, C.R.S., or a fire authority established pursuant to section 29-1-203.5.

(1.5) "Local government" means a county, home rule or statutory city, town, territorial charter city, or city and county.

"Power authority" means an authority created pursuant to section 29-1-204.

Source:

L. 74:

Entire article added, p. 353, § 1, effective May 17.

L. 2001:

(2) added, p. 597, § 3, effective May 30.

L. 2001, 2nd Ex. Sess.:

(1) amended and (1.5) added, p. 27, § 2, effective November 6.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 1559, § 1, effective May 29.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (SB 13-258), ch. 255, p. 1348, § 2, effective May 23.

L. 2016:

(1.3) added, (HB 16-1088), ch. 259, p. 1059, § 2, effective June 8.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Public Safety Fairness Act") in HB 16-1088, see section 1 of chapter 259, Session Laws of Colorado 2016.

29-20-104. Powers of local governments - definition.

Except as expressly provided in section 29-20-104.5, the power and authority granted by this section does not limit any power or authority presently exercised or previously granted. Each local government within its respective jurisdiction has the authority to plan for and regulate the use of land by:

Regulating development and activities in hazardous areas;

Protecting lands from activities which would cause immediate or foreseeable material danger to significant wildlife habitat and would endanger a wildlife species;

Preserving areas of historical and archaeological importance;

Regulating, with respect to the establishment of, roads on public lands administered by the federal government; this authority includes authority to prohibit, set conditions for, or require a permit for the establishment of any road authorized under the general right-of-way granted to the public by 43 U.S.C. 932 (R.S. 2477) but does not include authority to prohibit, set conditions for, or require a permit for the establishment of any road authorized for mining claim purposes by 30 U.S.C. 21 et seq., or under any specific permit or lease granted by the federal government;

Regulating the location of activities and developments which may result in significant changes in population density;

Regulating development or redevelopment in order to promote the construction of new affordable housing units. The provisions of section 38-12-301 shall not apply to any land use regulation adopted pursuant to this section that restricts rents on newly constructed or redeveloped housing units as long as the regulation provides a choice of options to the property owner or land developer and creates one or more alternatives to the construction of new affordable housing units on the building site. Nothing in this subsection (1)(e.5) is construed to authorize a local government to adopt or enforce any ordinance or regulation that would have the effect of controlling rent on any existing private residential housing unit in violation of section 38-12-301.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a local government shall not exercise the authority granted by subsection (1)(e.5) of this section unless the local government demonstrates, at the time it enacts a land use regulation for the purpose of exercising such authority, it has taken one or more of the following actions to increase the overall number and density of housing units within its jurisdictional boundaries or to promote or create incentives to the construction of affordable housing units:

Adopt changes to its zoning and land use policies that are intended to increase the overall density and availability of housing, including but not limited to:

Changing its zoning regulations to increase the number of housing units allowed on a particular site;

Promoting mixed-use zoning that permits housing units to be incorporated in a wider range of developments;

Permitting more than one dwelling unit per lot in traditional single-family lots;

Increasing the permitted household size in single family homes;

Promoting denser housing development near transit stations and places of employment;

Granting reduced parking requirements to residential or mixed-use developments that include housing near transit stations or affordable housing developments;

Granting density bonuses to development projects that incorporate affordable housing units; or

Adopting policies to promote the diversity of the housing stock within the local community including a mix of both for-sale and rental housing opportunities;

Materially reduce or eliminate utility charges, regulatory fees, or taxes imposed by the local government applicable to affordable housing units;

Grant affordable housing developments material regulatory relief from any type of zoning or other land development regulations that would ordinarily restrict the density of new development or redevelopment;

Adopt policies to materially make surplus property owned by the local government available for the development of housing; or

Adopt any other regulatory measure that is expressly designed and intended to increase the supply of housing within the local government's jurisdictional boundaries.

The department of local affairs shall offer guidance to assist local governments in connection with the implementation of this section.

Providing for phased development of services and facilities;

Regulating the use of land on the basis of the impact of the use on the community or surrounding areas;

Regulating the surface impacts of oil and gas operations in a reasonable manner to address matters specified in this subsection (1)(h) and to protect and minimize adverse impacts to public health, safety, and welfare and the environment. Nothing in this subsection (1)(h) is intended to alter, expand, or diminish the authority of local governments to regulate air quality under section 25-7-128. For purposes of this subsection (1)(h), "minimize adverse impacts" means, to the extent necessary and reasonable, to protect public health, safety, and welfare and the environment by avoiding adverse impacts from oil and gas operations and minimizing and mitigating the extent and severity of those impacts that cannot be avoided. The following matters are covered by this subsection (1)(h):

Land use;

The location and siting of oil and gas facilities and oil and gas locations, as those terms are defined in section 34-60-103 (6.2) and (6.4);

Impacts to public facilities and services;

Water quality and source, noise, vibration, odor, light, dust, air emissions and air quality, land disturbance, reclamation procedures, cultural resources, emergency preparedness and coordination with first responders, security, and traffic and transportation impacts;

Financial securities, indemnification, and insurance as appropriate to ensure compliance with the regulations of the local government; and

All other nuisance-type effects of oil and gas development; and

Otherwise planning for and regulating the use of land so as to provide planned and orderly use of land and protection of the environment in a manner consistent with constitutional rights.

To implement the powers and authority granted in subsection (1)(h) of this section, a local government within its respective jurisdiction has the authority to:

Inspect all facilities subject to local government regulation;

Impose fines for leaks, spills, and emissions; and

Impose fees on operators or owners to cover the reasonably foreseeable direct and indirect costs of permitting and regulation and the costs of any monitoring and inspection program necessary to address the impacts of development and to enforce local governmental requirements.

To provide a local government with technical expertise regarding whether a preliminary or final determination of the location of an oil and gas facility or oil and gas location within its respective jurisdiction could affect oil and gas resource recovery:

Once an operator, as defined in section 34-60-103 (6.8), files an application for the location and siting of an oil and gas facility or oil and gas location and the local government has made either a preliminary or final determination regarding the application, the local government having land use jurisdiction may ask the director of the oil and gas conservation commission pursuant to section 34-60-104.5 (3) to appoint a technical review board to conduct a technical review of the preliminary or final determination and issue a report that contains the board's conclusions.

Once a local government has made a final determination regarding an application specified in subsection (3)(a)(I) of this section or if the local government has not made a final determination on an application within two hundred ten days after filing by the operator, the operator may ask the director of the oil and gas conservation commission pursuant to section 34-60-104.5 (3) to appoint a technical review board to conduct a technical review of the final determination and issue a report that contains the board's conclusions.

A local government may finalize its preliminary determination without any changes based on the technical review report, finalize its preliminary determination with changes based on the report, or reconsider or do nothing with regard to its already finalized determination.

If an applicant or local government requests a technical review pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section, the period to appeal a local government's determination pursuant to rule 106 (a)(4) of the Colorado rules of civil procedure is tolled until the report specified in subsection (3)(a) of this section has been issued, and the applicant is afforded the full period to appeal thereafter.

Source:

L. 74:

Entire article added, p. 353, § 1, effective May 17.

L. 2001, 2nd Ex. Sess.:

IP(1) amended, p. 28, § 3, effective November 6.

L. 2019:

IP(1), (1)(g), and (1)(h) amended and (1)(i), (2), and (3) added, (SB 19-181), ch. 120, p. 503, § 4, effective April 16.

L. 2021:

(1)(e.5), (1)(e.7), and (1)(e.9) added (HB 21-1117), ch. 202, p. 1065, § 2, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

(1)(e.9) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2982, § 71, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

43 U.S.C. 932, as referenced in subsection (1)(d), was repealed in 1976 by section 706 (a) of Pub.L. 94-579, but said repeal does not terminate any land use right or authorization existing prior to the repeal. See section 701 (a) of Pub.L. 94-579.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1117, see section 1 of chapter 202, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

29-20-104.5. Impact fees - definition.

Pursuant to the authority granted in section 29-20-104 (1)(g) and as a condition of issuance of a development permit, a local government may impose an impact fee or other similar development charge to fund expenditures by such local government or a fire and emergency services provider that provides fire protection, rescue, and emergency services in the new development on capital facilities needed to serve new development. No impact fee or other similar development charge shall be imposed except pursuant to a schedule that is:

Legislatively adopted;

Generally applicable to a broad class of property; and

Intended to defray the projected impacts on capital facilities caused by proposed development.

A local government shall quantify the reasonable impacts of proposed development on existing capital facilities and establish the impact fee or development charge at a level no greater than necessary to defray such impacts directly related to proposed development. No impact fee or other similar development charge shall be imposed to remedy any deficiency in capital facilities that exists without regard to the proposed development.

A local government shall confer with any fire and emergency services provider that provides fire protection, rescue, and emergency medical services in a new development, together with the owner or developer of the development, to assess and determine whether there should be an impact fee or other similar development charge imposed to defray the impacts to the fire and emergency services provider.

If a local government, in its sole discretion, elects to impose an impact fee or other similar development charge to fund the expenditures by a fire and emergency services provider for a capital facility, then the local government and fire and emergency services provider shall enter into an intergovernmental agreement defining the impact fee or other similar development charge and the details of collection and remittance.

A local government that imposes an impact fee or other similar development charge to fund the expenditures by a fire and emergency services provider for a capital facility shall pay the impact fees or other similar development charges collected to the fire protection and emergency service provider.

Any schedule of impact fees or other similar development charges adopted by a local government pursuant to this section shall include provisions to ensure that no individual landowner is required to provide any site specific dedication or improvement to meet the same need for capital facilities for which the impact fee or other similar development charge is imposed. A local government shall not impose an impact fee or other similar development charge on an individual landowner to fund expenditures for a capital facility used to provide fire, rescue, and emergency services if the landowner is already required to pay an impact fee or other similar development charge for another capital facility used to provide a similar fire, rescue, and emergency service or if the landowner has voluntarily contributed money for such a capital facility.

As used in this section, the term "capital facility" means any improvement or facility that:

Is directly related to any service that a local government or a fire and emergency services provider is authorized to provide;

Has an estimated useful life of five years or longer; and

Is required by the charter or general policy of a local government or fire and emergency services provider pursuant to a resolution or ordinance.

Any impact fee or other similar development charge shall be collected and accounted for in accordance with part 8 of article 1 of this title. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a local government may waive an impact fee or other similar development charge on the development of low- or moderate- income housing or affordable employee housing as defined by the local government.

No impact fee or other similar development charge shall be imposed on any development permit for which the applicant submitted a complete application before the adoption of a schedule of impact fees or other similar development charges by the local government pursuant to this section. No impact fee or other similar development charge imposed on any development activity shall be collected before the issuance of the development permit for such development activity. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a local government from deferring collection of an impact fee or other similar development charge until the issuance of a building permit or certificate of occupancy.

Any person or entity that owns or has an interest in land that is or becomes subject to a schedule of fees or charges enacted pursuant to this section shall, by filing an application for a development permit, have standing to file an action for declaratory judgment to determine whether such schedule complies with the provisions of this section. An applicant for a development permit who believes that a local government has improperly applied a schedule of fees or charges adopted pursuant to this section to the development application may pay the fee or charge imposed and proceed with development without prejudice to the applicant's right to challenge the fee or charge imposed under rule 106 of the Colorado rules of civil procedure. If the court determines that a local government has either imposed a fee or charge on a development that is not subject to the legislatively enacted schedule or improperly calculated the fee or charge due, it may enter judgment in favor of the applicant for the amount of any fee or charge wrongly collected with interest thereon from the date collected.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that the matters addressed in this section are matters of statewide concern.

This section shall not prohibit any local government from imposing impact fees or other similar development charges pursuant to a schedule that was legislatively adopted before October 1, 2001, so long as the local government complies with subsections (3), (5), (6), and (7) of this section. Any amendment of such schedule adopted after October 1, 2001, shall comply with all of the requirements of this section.

If any provision of this section is held invalid, such invalidity shall invalidate this section in its entirety, and to this end the provisions of this section are declared to be nonseverable.

Source:

L. 2001, 2nd Ex. Sess.:

Entire section added, p. 28, § 4, effective November 6.

L. 2016:

IP(1), (2), (3), (4)(a), and (4)(c) amended, (HB 16-1088), ch. 259, p. 1059, § 3, effective June 8.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Public Safety Fairness Act") in HB 16-1088, see section 1 of chapter 259, Session Laws of Colorado 2016.

29-20-105. Intergovernmental cooperation.

Local governments are authorized and encouraged to cooperate or contract with other units of government pursuant to part 2 of article 1 of this title for the purposes of planning or regulating the development of land including, but not limited to, the joint exercise of planning, zoning, subdivision, building, and related regulations.

Without limiting the ability of local governments to cooperate or contract with each other pursuant to the provisions of this part 1 or any other provision of law, local governments may provide through intergovernmental agreements for the joint adoption by the governing bodies, after notice and hearing, of mutually binding and enforceable comprehensive development plans for areas within their jurisdictions. This section shall not affect the validity of any intergovernmental agreement entered into prior to April 23, 1989.

A comprehensive development plan may contain master plans, zoning plans, subdivision regulations, and building code, permit, and other land use standards, which, if set out in specific detail, may be in lieu of such regulations or ordinances of the local governments.

Notwithstanding any other statutory provisions of article 28 of title 30, C.R.S., review of comprehensive development plans by the planning commissions of the local governments shall be discretionary, unless otherwise required by local ordinance. This subsection (2) shall not apply to the requirements of sections 30-28-110 and 30-28-127, C.R.S.

An intergovernmental agreement providing for a comprehensive development plan may contain a provision that the plan may be amended only by the mutual agreement of the governing bodies of the local governments who are parties to the plan.

In the event that a plan is silent as to a specific land use matter, existing local land use regulations shall control.

An intergovernmental agreement may contain provisions concerning annexation, including, but not limited to provisions:

That a comprehensive development plan shall continue to control particular land areas even though the land areas are annexed or jurisdiction over the land areas is otherwise transferred pursuant to law between the local governmental entities who are parties to the agreement;

For revenue sharing between local governments; and

Concerning land areas that may be annexed by municipalities and the conditions related to such annexations as established in the comprehensive development plan.

Nothing in this paragraph (f) shall be construed to render invalid any intergovernmental agreement or comprehensive development plan entered into prior to November 6, 2001.

Each governing body that is a party to an intergovernmental agreement adopting a comprehensive development plan shall have standing in district court to enforce the terms of the agreement and the plan, including specific performance and injunctive relief. The district court shall schedule all actions to enforce an intergovernmental agreement and comprehensive development plan for expedited hearing.

Local governments may, pursuant to an intergovernmental agreement, provide for revenue-sharing.

Local governments shall not be required to enter into intergovernmental agreements or comprehensive development plans pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 74:

Entire article added, p. 354, § 1, effective May 17.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1268, § 1, effective April 23.

L. 99:

(2)(a) amended, p. 590, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2001, 2nd Ex. Sess.:

(2)(f) amended, p. 31, § 1, effective November 6.

29-20-105.5. Intergovernmental cooperation - intergovernmental agreements to address wildland fire mitigation - land owned by municipality for utility purposes - legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that:

As wildland fires are impervious to the territorial boundaries of political subdivisions, adequate protection against the harm and hazards caused by such fires necessitates the full cooperation of all governmental entities within whose contiguous territorial boundaries forest lands or wildland areas are located;

Because of the likely threat that wildland fires may cross territorial boundaries, particularly if cooperative fire mitigation policies are not established and maintained, protecting the public from the dangers of such fires, especially fires occurring in wildland-urban interface areas, is a matter of statewide concern;

The provisions of this section are necessary to protect the public from the dangers of forest land and wildland fires; and

The provisions of this section are enacted for the purpose of authorizing and requiring intergovernmental cooperation between a county and any local governments that own land areas located within the county to mitigate the harm caused by forest land or wildland fires affecting such contiguous land areas in the interest of protecting the public health and safety.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Fire department" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 24-33.5-1202 (3.7), C.R.S., and includes a fire department that uses paid firefighters, volunteer firefighters, or both. The term includes, without limitation, a not-for-profit nongovernmental entity that is organized to provide firefighting services.

"Forest land" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 39-1-102 (4.3), C.R.S.

"Local government" means a home rule or statutory city, town, territorial charter city, or a city and county. "Local government" does not include a county or a home rule county.

"Wildland area" means an area in which development is essentially nonexistent, except for roads, railroads, power lines, and similar infrastructure, and in which structures, if present, are widely scattered.

"Wildland fire" means an unplanned or unwanted fire in a wildland area, including an unauthorized human-caused fire, an out-of-control prescribed fire, and any other fire in a wildland area where the objective is to extinguish the fire.

"Utility purposes" means the use or management of property by a local government that is reasonably related to the provision of electric, natural gas, water, wastewater, and telecomunication services.

On or before July 1, 2012, each local government that owns any land area for any reason other than for utility purposes that is located either entirely or partially outside its own territorial boundaries and inside the territorial boundaries of a county and that contains at least fifty percent forest land or land that constitutes a wildland area shall enter into an intergovernmental agreement with the county for the purpose of mitigating forest land or wildland fires affecting the contiguous land areas of the local government and county.
(3) (a) (I) On or before July 1, 2012, each local government that owns any land area for any reason other than for utility purposes that is located either entirely or partially outside its own territorial boundaries and inside the territorial boundaries of a county and that contains at least fifty percent forest land or land that constitutes a wildland area shall enter into an intergovernmental agreement with the county for the purpose of mitigating forest land or wildland fires affecting the contiguous land areas of the local government and county.

On or before July 1, 2012, each local government that owns any land area for utility purposes that is located either entirely or partially outside its own territorial boundaries and inside the territorial boundaries of a county and that contains at least fifty percent forest land or land that constitutes a wildland area shall either:

Enter into an intergovernmental agreement with the county for the purpose of mitigating forest land or wildland fires affecting the contiguous land areas of the local government and county; or

Enter into an agreement with the Colorado state forest service created in section 36-7-201 (1), C.R.S., for the purpose of mitigating forest land or wildland fires affecting the contiguous land areas of the local government and county, and provide notification of the agreement to any county in which the local government owns any land area.

In association with the governmental parties entering into any intergovernmental agreement or agreement with the Colorado state forest service, the parties to the agreement shall consult with any utility providers that have facilities in the areas subject to the agreement to the extent the provisions of the agreement will affect the providers.

Any agreement required by subparagraph (I) or (II) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) shall address, without limitation, the following matters:

The identification of all parties to the agreement and their respective roles and responsibilities with respect to the mitigation of forest land and wildland fires;

The procedures for cooperation and coordination among the parties to the agreement;

Management objectives for forest land and wildland fire prevention, preparedness, mitigation, suppression, reclamation, or rehabilitation and the designation of the local government with fiscal and operational authority for each objective;

A description of available emergency or mutual aid resources in the event of forest land or wildland fires;

The specification of reimbursement and billing procedures; and

Action that may be undertaken by one party to the agreement if another party to the agreement fails to satisfy its duties or responsibilities under the agreement.

The agreement required pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) shall be executed by all parties to the agreement.

Nothing in this section shall require any local government to enter into a new agreement if the local government is a party to an agreement in existence as of August 5, 2009, including, without limitation, a mutual aid agreement, that satisfies the requirements of this section unless the terms of any such agreement, including a mutual aid agreement, fail to address the responsibility among local governments for mitigating wildland fires in wildland-urban interface areas.

In accordance with the requirements of section 33-10-108 (3)(a), C.R.S., and pursuant to a contract, intergovernmental agreement, or memorandum of understanding, the division of parks and wildlife created in section 33-9-104, C.R.S., may allow fire mitigation personnel and accompanying equipment and material under the control or supervision of a fire department to enter state parks, state recreation areas, and natural areas for the purpose of mitigating forest land or wildland fires in or around such parks, recreation areas, and natural areas. Permissible activities to be undertaken by a fire department under this paragraph (a) include, without limitation, prescribed burning as a component of wildfire mitigation or forest or wildland management and exercises to promote the training of firefighting personnel.

Nothing in paragraph (a) of this subsection (5) shall be construed as affecting the authority of any state agency other than the division of parks and wildlife to enter into a contract, intergovernmental agreement, or memorandum of understanding for the purpose of allowing fire mitigation personnel and accompanying equipment and material under the control or supervision of a fire department to enter land areas under the jurisdiction of the state agency to undertake the permissible activities specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (5).

For purposes of this subsection (5), "state agency" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 24-18-102 (9), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (HB 09-1162), ch. 191, p. 833, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2011:

(3)(a) amended, (HB 11-1317), ch. 229, p. 982, § 1, effective May 27.

L. 2012:

(2)(b.5) and (2)(e) added and (3)(a) and IP(3)(b) amended, (HB12-1285), ch. 85, p. 282, § 1, effective April 6.

L. 2013:

(2)(a) amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1693, § 92, effective August 7.

29-20-105.6. Notification to military installations by local governments of land use changes - legislative declaration - definitions.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that it is desirable for local governments in the state to cooperate with military installations located within the state in order to encourage compatible land use, help prevent incompatible urban encroachment upon military installations, and facilitate the continued presence of major military installations within the state.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Local government" means a county, home rule or statutory city, town, territorial charter city, or a city and county.

"Military installation" means:

A base, camp, post, station, airfield, yard, center, or any other land area under the jurisdiction of the United States department of defense, including any leased facility, the total acreage of which installation is in excess of five hundred acres; or

The Greeley Air National Guard station.

Each local government whose territorial boundaries are within two miles of all or any portion of a military installation shall timely provide to the installation commanding officer and the flying mission commanding officer, or their designees, information relating to proposed zoning changes, and amendments to the local government's comprehensive plan, or land development regulations that, if approved, would affect the use of any area within two miles of the military installation. Nothing in this subsection (3) is intended to require submission of any information in connection with a site-specific development application under consideration by the local government.

Upon submission of the information required to be provided pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the military installation shall have fourteen business days within which to review the information and submit comments to the local government on the impact the proposed changes may have on the mission of the military installation. Such comments may include:

If the military installation has an airfield, whether the proposed changes will be compatible with the safety and noise standards contained in the air installation compatible use zone recommended by United States department of defense instruction 4165.57 for that airfield;

Whether the proposed changes are compatible with the installation environmental noise management program of the military installation;

Whether the proposed changes are compatible with any joint land use study for the area within which the changes are to take place, if such study has been completed; or

Whether the military installation's mission will be adversely affected by the proposed changes.

The local government shall review any comments received from the commanding officer or the flying mission commanding officer, or their designees, pursuant to subsection (4) of this section when considering approval of a comprehensive plan, amendments to the plan, or its land development regulations. The local government shall forward a copy of any such comments received to the office of smart growth created in section 24-32-3203 (1)(a), C.R.S.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, nothing in this section is intended or shall be construed to require a local government to prepare a new master plan in effect as of August 11, 2010, in order to satisfy any of the requirements of this section.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (SB 10-1205), ch. 242, p. 1076, § 1, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 29-1-207 as it existed prior to 2010.

29-20-106. Receipt of funds.

Without limiting or superseding any authority presently exercised or previously granted, local governments are hereby authorized to receive and expend funds from other governmental and private sources for the purposes of planning for or regulating the use of land within their respective jurisdictions.

Source:

L. 74:

Entire article added, p. 354, § 1, effective May 17.

29-20-107. Compliance with other requirements.

Except as provided in section 29-20-105 (2), where other procedural or substantive requirements for the planning for or regulation of the use of land are provided by law, such requirements shall control.

Source:

L. 74:

Entire article added, p. 354, § 1, effective May 17.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1269, § 2, effective April 23.